Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 52. Health Care Decisions Act.

Cross references. —

For authority giving continuing effect to an anatomical gift made under former AS

13.50.010

— 13.50.090 in effect on January 1, 2005, until the instrument of donation is revoked, see sec. 16(a), ch. 83, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

For authority giving continuing effect to an anatomical gift under the provisions of former AS

13.52.170

—

13.52.280

, repealed by ch. 100, SLA 2008, until the anatomical gift is revoked under provisions in this chapter enacted by ch. 100, SLA 2008, see § 38, ch. 100, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 103, SLA 2006 reads as follows:

CONTINUING EFFECT OF DO NOT RESUSCITATE ORDERS. A do not resuscitate order made under AS 18.12 before January 1, 2005, continues in effect under AS 13.52 unless the do not resuscitate order is made ineffective under AS

13.52.065(f)

, amended by sec. 7 of this Act, or under another provision of AS 13.52.

Sec. 13.52.010.
Advance health care directives.

Except as provided in AS

13.52.173

, an adult may give an individual instruction. Except as provided in AS

13.52.177

, the instruction may be oral or written. The instruction may be limited to take effect only if a specified condition arises.

An adult may execute a durable power of attorney for health care, which may authorize the agent to make any health care decision the principal could have made while having capacity. The power remains in effect notwithstanding the principal’s later incapacity and may include individual instructions. The power must be in writing, contain the date of its execution, be signed by the principal, and be witnessed by one of the following methods:

signed by at least two individuals who are personally known by the principal, each of whom witnessed either the signing of the instrument by the principal or the principal’s acknowledgment of the signature of the instrument; or

acknowledged before a notary public at a place in this state.

Unless related to the principal by blood, marriage, or adoption, an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care may not be an owner, operator, or employee of the health care institution at which the principal is receiving care.

A witness for a durable power of attorney for health care may not be

a health care provider employed at the health care institution or health care facility where the principal is receiving health care;

an employee of the health care provider providing health care to the principal, or of the health care institution or health care facility where the principal is receiving health care; or

the agent.

At least one of the individuals used as a witness for a durable power of attorney for health care shall be someone who is not

related to the principal by blood, marriage, or adoption; or

entitled to a portion of the estate of the principal upon the principal’s death under a will or codicil of the principal existing at the time of execution of the durable power of attorney for health care or by operation of law then existing.

Unless otherwise specified in the durable power of attorney for health care, the authority of an agent becomes effective only upon a determination that the principal lacks capacity and ceases to be effective upon a determination that the principal has recovered capacity.

Unless otherwise specified in a written advance health care directive, a determination that a principal lacks or has recovered capacity, or that another condition exists that affects an individual instruction or the authority of an agent, shall be made by

the primary physician, except in the case of mental illness;

a court in the case of mental illness, unless the situation is an emergency; or

the primary physician or another health care provider in the case of mental illness where the situation is an emergency.

An agent shall make a health care decision in accordance with the principal’s individual instructions, if any, and other wishes to the extent known to the agent. Otherwise, the agent shall make the decision in accordance with the agent’s determination of the principal’s best interest. In determining the principal’s best interest, the agent shall consider the principal’s personal values to the extent known to the agent.

A health care decision made by an agent for a principal is effective without judicial approval.

A written advance health care directive may include the individual’s nomination of a guardian of the individual.

Except as provided in AS

13.52.247(a)

, an advance health care directive, including an advance health care directive that is made in compliance with the laws of another state, is valid for purposes of this chapter if it complies with this chapter, regardless of where or when it was executed or communicated.

Notwithstanding the sample form provided under AS

13.52.300

, an individual instruction that would be valid by itself under this chapter is valid even if the individual instruction is contained in a writing that also contains a durable power of attorney for health care and the durable power of attorney does not meet the witnessing or other requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 103 SLA 2006; am §§ 10, 11 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 103, SLA 2006 makes the 2006 amendment of subsection (k) and the addition of subsection (

l

) retroactive to January 1, 2005.

Sec. 13.52.020.
Revocation of advance health care directive.

Except in the case of mental illness under (c) of this section, a principal may revoke the designation of an agent only by a signed writing or by personally informing the supervising health care provider.

Except in the case of mental illness under (c) of this section and except as provided by AS

13.52.183

, a principal may revoke all or part of an advance health care directive, other than the designation of an agent, at any time and in any manner that communicates an intent to revoke.

In the case of mental illness, an advance health care directive may be revoked in whole or in part at any time by the principal if the principal does not lack capacity and is competent. A revocation is effective when a competent principal with capacity communicates the revocation to a physician or other health care provider. The physician or other health care provider shall note the revocation on the principal’s medical record. In the case of mental illness, the authority of a named agent and an alternative agent named in the advance health care directive continues in effect as long as the advance health care directive appointing the agent is in effect or until the agent has withdrawn. For the purposes of this subsection, a principal is not considered competent when

it is the opinion of the court in a guardianship proceeding under AS 13.26, the opinion of two physicians, at least one of whom is a psychiatrist, or the opinion of a physician and a professional mental health clinician, that the principal is not competent; or

a court in a hearing under AS

47.30.735

,

47.30.750

, or

47.30.770

determines that the principal is gravely disabled; in this paragraph, “gravely disabled” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

(9)(B).

A health care provider, agent, guardian, or surrogate who is informed of a revocation shall promptly communicate the fact of the revocation to the supervising health care provider and to any health care institution at which the patient is receiving care.

A decree of annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage, or legal separation revokes a previous designation of a spouse as agent unless otherwise specified in the decree or in a durable power of attorney for health care.

An advance health care directive that conflicts with an earlier advance health care directive revokes the earlier directive to the extent of the conflict.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 103 SLA 2006; am § 12 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2018, in paragraph (c)(2), “AS

47.30.915

(9)(B)” was substituted for “AS

47.30.915

(7)(B)” to reflect the 2014 renumbering of AS 47.30.915.

Editor's notes. —

Section 15, ch. 103, SLA 2006 makes the 2006 amendment of subsection (c) retroactive to January 1, 2005.

Sec. 13.52.025.
Rescission of withdrawal by agent.

A person who has withdrawn as an agent may rescind the withdrawal by executing an acceptance after the date of the withdrawal. A person who rescinds a withdrawal shall give notice to the principal if the principal has capacity or to the principal’s health care provider if the principal does not have capacity.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.030.
Surrogates.

Except in the case of mental health treatment and except as provided by AS

13.52.173

and

13.52.193

, a surrogate may make a health care decision for a patient who is an adult if an agent or guardian has not been appointed or the agent or guardian is not reasonably available, and if the patient has been determined by the primary physician to lack capacity.

Subject to AS

13.52.055(b)

, a surrogate may make a decision regarding mental health treatment for a patient who is an adult if

an agent or guardian has not been appointed or the agent or guardian is not reasonably available;

the mental health treatment is needed on an emergency basis; and

the patient has been determined to lack capacity by

two physicians, one of whom is a psychiatrist; or

a physician and a professional mental health clinician.

Except as provided for anatomical gifts in AS

13.52.173

, an adult may designate an individual to act as surrogate for that adult by personally informing the supervising health care provider. Except as provided by AS

13.52.173

or

13.52.193

, in the absence of a designation, or if the designee is not reasonably available, a member of the following classes of the patient’s family who is reasonably available, in descending order of priority, may act as surrogate:

the spouse, unless legally separated;

an adult child;

a parent; or

an adult sibling.

Except as provided by (l) of this section or AS

13.52.173

or

13.52.193

, if none of the individuals eligible to act as surrogate under (c) of this section is reasonably available, an adult who has exhibited special care and concern for the patient, who is familiar with the patient’s personal values, and who is reasonably available may act as surrogate.

A surrogate shall communicate the surrogate’s assumption of authority as promptly as practicable to the health care provider, the health care institution, and the members of the patient’s family specified in (c) of this section who can be readily contacted.

If more than one member of a class under (c)(2) — (4) of this section assumes authority to act as surrogate, the members of that class do not agree on a health care decision, and the supervising health care provider is informed of the disagreement, the supervising health care provider shall comply with the decision of a majority of the members of that class who have communicated their views to the provider. If the class is evenly divided concerning the health care decision and the supervising health care provider is informed of the even division, that class and all individuals having a lower priority under (c)(2) — (4) of this section are disqualified from making the decision, and the primary physician, after consulting with all individuals in that evenly divided class who are reasonably available, shall make a decision based on the consultation and the primary physician’s own determination of the best interest of the patient.

A surrogate shall make a health care decision in accordance with the patient’s individual instructions or other advance health care directives, if any, and other wishes to the extent known to the surrogate. Otherwise, the surrogate shall make the decision in accordance with the surrogate’s determination of the patient’s best interest. In determining the patient’s best interest, the surrogate shall consider the patient’s personal values to the extent known to the surrogate.

If a patient’s primary health care provider observes that a surrogate is not abiding by the wishes, values, and best interest of the patient, the primary health care provider may decline to comply with a decision of the surrogate and shall notify the health care institution where the primary health care provider is providing health care to the patient.

A health care decision made by a surrogate for a patient is effective without judicial approval.

A patient who has capacity may, at any time, disqualify another person, including a member of the patient’s family, from acting as the patient’s surrogate by a signed writing or by personally informing the supervising health care provider of the disqualification.

Unless related to the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption, a surrogate may not be an owner, operator, or employee of the health care facility where the patient is receiving care.

A supervising health care provider may require an individual claiming the right to act as a surrogate for a patient to provide a written declaration under penalty of perjury stating facts and circumstances reasonably sufficient to establish the claimed authority.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.040.
Decisions by guardian.

Subject to AS

13.52.183

,

13.52.193

, and

13.52.203

, a guardian shall comply with the ward’s individual instructions and may not revoke a ward’s advance health care directive executed before the ward’s incapacity unless a court expressly authorizes the revocation.

Unless there is a court order to the contrary, a health care decision of an agent takes precedence over that of a guardian.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, a health care decision made by a guardian for the ward is effective without judicial approval.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 16 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.045.
Withholding or withdrawing of life-sustaining procedures.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an agent or a surrogate may determine that life-sustaining procedures may be withheld or withdrawn from a patient with a qualifying condition when there is

a durable power of attorney for health care or other writing that clearly expresses the patient’s intent that the procedures be withheld or withdrawn; or

no durable power of attorney for health care or other writing that clearly expresses the patient’s intent to the contrary, the patient has a qualifying condition as determined under AS

13.52.160

, and withholding or withdrawing the procedures would be consistent with the patient’s best interest.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.050.
Decisions for exceptional procedures.

Unless there is a durable power of attorney for health care or another writing clearly expressing an individual’s intent to the contrary, an agent or surrogate may not consent on behalf of a patient to an abortion, sterilization, psychosurgery, or removal of bodily organs except when the abortion, sterilization, psychosurgery, or removal of bodily organs is necessary to preserve the life of the patient or to prevent serious impairment of the health of the patient.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.055.
Pregnancy.

Before implementing a health care decision for a woman of childbearing age that would affect a fetus if present, the supervising health care provider shall take reasonable steps to determine whether the woman is pregnant.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, an advance health care directive by a patient or a decision by the person then authorized to make health care decisions for a patient may not be given effect if

the patient is a woman who is pregnant and lacks capacity;

the directive or decision is to withhold or withdraw life-sustaining procedures;

the withholding or withdrawal of the life-sustaining procedures would, in reasonable medical judgment, be likely to result in the death of the patient; and

it is probable that the fetus could develop to the point of live birth if the life-sustaining procedures were provided.

This section does not apply to emergency services in the field.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.060.
Obligations of health care providers, institutions, and facilities.

Before implementing a health care decision made for a patient, a supervising health care provider, if possible, shall promptly communicate to the patient the decision made and the identity of the person making the decision.

A supervising health care provider who knows of the existence of an advance health care directive, a revocation of an advance health care directive, or a designation or disqualification of a surrogate shall promptly record its existence in the patient’s health care record, shall request a copy if it is in writing, and shall arrange for its maintenance in the health care record if a copy is furnished.

A supervising health care provider who makes or is informed of a determination that a patient lacks or has recovered capacity, or that another condition exists that affects an individual instruction or the authority of an agent, a guardian, or a surrogate, shall promptly record the determination in the patient’s health care record and communicate the determination to the patient, if possible, and to any person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

Except as provided in (e), (f), and (i) of this section and by AS

13.52.253

, a health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility providing care to a patient shall comply with

an individual instruction of the patient and with a reasonable interpretation of that instruction made by a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient; and

a health care decision for the patient made by a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient to the same extent as if the decision had been made by the patient while having capacity.

A health care provider may decline to comply with an individual instruction or a health care decision for reasons of conscience, except for a do not resuscitate order. A health care institution or health care facility may decline to comply with an individual instruction or health care decision if the instruction or decision is contrary to a policy of the institution or facility that is expressly based on reasons of conscience and if the policy was timely communicated to the patient or to a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

A health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility may decline to comply with an individual instruction or a health care decision that requires medically ineffective health care or health care contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the provider, institution, or facility. In this subsection, “medically ineffective health care” means health care that according to reasonable medical judgment cannot cure the patient’s illness, cannot diminish its progressive course, and cannot effectively alleviate severe discomfort and distress.

A health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility that declines to comply with an individual instruction or a health care decision shall

promptly inform the patient, if possible, and any person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient that the provider, institution, or facility has declined to comply with the instruction or decision;

provide continuing care to the patient until a transfer is effected; and

unless the patient or person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient refuses assistance, immediately cooperate and comply with a decision by the patient or a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient to transfer the patient to another health care institution, to another health care facility, to the patient’s home, or to another location chosen by the patient or by the person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

Except as provided for civil commitments under AS

47.30.817

, a health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility may not require or prohibit the execution or revocation of an advance health care directive as a condition for providing health care.

Notwithstanding the exception in (e) of this section for do not resuscitate orders, a health care provider may perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other resuscitative measures on a patient even if there is a do not resuscitate order for the patient if the condition requiring cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other resuscitative measures is precipitated by complications arising out of medical services being provided by the health care provider to the patient.

The provisions of (i) of this section do not apply when a health care provider performs emergency medical services on a patient in the field, unless an online physician orders the health care provider to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other resuscitative measures; in this subsection,

“health care provider” does not include a physician;

“in the field” does not include in a health care facility, health care institution, hospital, or mental health facility;

“online physician” means a physician who is immediately available in person or by radio or telephone, when medically appropriate, for communication of medical direction to health care providers.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 44 SLA 2005; am §§ 4, 5 ch 103 SLA 2006; am § 17 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 103, SLA 2006 makes the 2006 amendment of subsection (d) and the addition of subsections (i) and (j) retroactive to January 1, 2005.

Sec. 13.52.065.
Do not resuscitate protocol and identification requirements.

A physician may issue a do not resuscitate order for a patient of the physician. The physician shall document the grounds for the order in the patient’s medical file.

The department shall by regulation adopt a protocol, subject to the approval of the State Medical Board, for do not resuscitate orders that sets out a standardized method of procedure for the withholding of cardiopulmonary resuscitation by health care providers and health care institutions.

The department shall develop standardized designs and symbols for do not resuscitate identification cards, forms, necklaces, and bracelets that signify, when carried or worn, that the carrier or wearer is an individual for whom a physician has issued a do not resuscitate order.

A health care provider other than a physician shall comply with the protocol adopted under (b) of this section for do not resuscitate orders when the health care provider is presented with a do not resuscitate identification, an oral do not resuscitate order issued directly by a physician if the applicable hospital allows oral do not resuscitate orders, or a written do not resuscitate order entered on and as required by a form prescribed by the department.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, if an individual has made an anatomical gift to occur at death and is in a hospital when a do not resuscitate order or an order to withdraw life-sustaining procedures is to be implemented for the individual, the order may not be implemented until the subject of the anatomical gift can be evaluated to determine if it is suitable for donation.

A do not resuscitate order may not be made ineffective unless a physician revokes the do not resuscitate order, a patient for whom the order is written and who has capacity requests that the do not resuscitate order be revoked, or the patient for whom the order is written is under 18 years of age and the parent or guardian of the patient requests that the do not resuscitate order be revoked. Any physician of a patient for whom a do not resuscitate order is written may revoke the do not resuscitate order if the person for whom the order is written requests that the physician revoke the do not resuscitate order.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am §§ 6, 7 ch 103 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 103, SLA 2006 makes the 2006 amendment of subsections (a) and (f) retroactive to January 1, 2005.

Sec. 13.52.070.
Health care information.

Unless otherwise specified in an advance health care directive, a person then authorized to make health care decisions for a patient has the same rights as the patient to request, receive, examine, copy, and consent to the disclosure of medical or other health care information.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if there is a question about the principal’s capacity, an agent or a surrogate of the principal may immediately access the personal health care information necessary to determine the principal’s capacity, even if the agency or surrogacy does not become effective until the principal lacks capacity.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.080.
Immunities.

A health care provider or health care institution that acts in good faith and in accordance with generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for

providing health care information in good faith under AS

13.52.070

;

complying with a health care decision of a person based on a good faith belief that the person has authority to make a health care decision for a patient, including a decision to withhold or withdraw health care;

declining to comply with a health care decision of a person based on a good faith belief that the person then lacked authority;

complying with an advance health care directive and assuming in good faith that the directive was valid when made and has not been revoked or terminated;

participating in the withholding or withdrawal of cardiopulmonary resuscitation under the direction or with the authorization of a physician or upon discovery of do not resuscitate identification upon an individual;

causing or participating in providing cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-sustaining procedures

under AS

13.52.065(e)

when an individual has made an anatomical gift;

because an individual has made a do not resuscitate order ineffective under AS

13.52.065(f)

or another provision of this chapter; or

because the patient is a woman of childbearing age and AS

13.52.055

applies; or

acting in good faith under the terms of this chapter or the law of another state relating to anatomical gifts.

An individual acting as an agent, a guardian, or a surrogate under this chapter is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for health care decisions made in good faith.

A health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility is not subject to civil or criminal liability, or to discipline for unprofessional conduct, if a do not resuscitate order prevents the health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility from attempting to resuscitate a patient who requires cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other resuscitative measures because of complications arising out of health care being administered to the patient by the health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility. This subsection does not apply if the complications suffered by the patient are caused by gross negligence or reckless or intentional actions on the part of the health care provider, health care institution, or health care facility.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am §§ 8, 9 ch 103 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 103, SLA 2006 makes the 2006 amendment of subsection (a) and the addition of subsection (c) retroactive to January 1, 2005.

Sec. 13.52.090.
Statutory damages.

A health care provider or institution that intentionally violates this chapter is liable to the aggrieved individual or the individual’s estate for damages of $10,000 or actual damages resulting from the violation, whichever is greater, plus attorney fees as provided by court rule.

A person who intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates an individual’s advance health care directive or a revocation of an advance health care directive without the individual’s consent, or who coerces or fraudulently induces an individual to give, revoke, or not to give an advance health care directive, is liable to that individual for damages of $10,000 or actual damages resulting from the action, whichever is greater, plus attorney fees as provided by court rule.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.100.
Capacity.

This chapter does not affect the right of an individual to make health care decisions while having capacity to make health care decisions.

An individual is rebuttably presumed to have capacity to make a health care decision, to give or revoke an advance health care directive, and to designate or disqualify a surrogate.

An individual who is a qualified patient, including an individual for whom a physician has issued a do not resuscitate order, has the right to make a decision regarding the use of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and other life-sustaining procedures as long as the individual is able to make the decision. If an individual who is a qualified patient, including an individual for whom a physician has issued a do not resuscitate order, is not able to make the decision, the protocol adopted under AS

13.52.065

for do not resuscitate orders governs a decision regarding the use of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and other life-sustaining procedures.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.110.
Status of copy.

A copy of a written advance health care directive, revocation of an advance health care directive, or designation or disqualification of an agent or a surrogate has the same effect as the original.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.120.
Effect of this chapter.

In the absence of evidence to the contrary of the patient’s intent, this chapter establishes a presumption in favor of life, consistent with the best interest of the patient.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, death resulting from the withholding or withdrawal of cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-sustaining procedures does not, for any purpose, constitute a suicide or homicide if the withholding or withdrawal is

consistent with this chapter; and

from an individual

for whom a do not resuscitate order has not been issued;

for whom a do not resuscitate order has been issued under

the protocol for do not resuscitate orders established under AS

13.52.065

; or

a do not resuscitate identification found on the individual.

The issuance of a do not resuscitate order under this chapter, the possession of do not resuscitate identification under this chapter, or the making of a health care directive under this chapter does not affect in any manner the sale, procurement, or issuance of a policy of life insurance, and does not modify the terms of an existing policy of life insurance. A policy of life insurance is not legally impaired or invalidated in any manner by the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures from an insured individual or the withholding or withdrawal of cardiopulmonary resuscitation from an individual who possesses do not resuscitate identification or for whom a do not resuscitate order has been issued, notwithstanding any term of the policy to the contrary.

This chapter does not authorize mercy killing, assisted suicide, or euthanasia.

This chapter does not authorize or require a health care provider or institution to provide health care contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution.

This chapter does not authorize an agent or a surrogate to consent to the admission of an individual to a mental health facility unless the individual’s written advance health care directive expressly so provides, and the period of admission may not exceed 17 days.

This chapter does not affect other statutes of this state governing treatment for mental illness of an individual involuntarily committed to a mental health facility.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 83, SLA 2004, provides that subsection (c) of this section “does not apply to a policy of insurance or an annuity that was entered into before January 1, 2005.”

Sec. 13.52.130.
Prohibited requirements.

As a condition of receiving or being insured for health care services, a health care provider, a health care institution, a health care service plan, an insurer issuing health insurance, a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, or a nonprofit hospital plan may not require an individual to execute a health care directive, obtain a do not resuscitate order from a physician, or possess do not resuscitate identification.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.135.
Discriminatory treatment prohibited.

When determining the best interest of a patient under this chapter, health care treatment may not be denied to a patient because the patient has a disability or is expected to have a disability.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.140.
Judicial relief.

On petition of a patient, the patient’s agent, guardian, or surrogate, or a health care provider or institution involved with the patient’s care, the superior court may enjoin or direct a health care decision or order other equitable relief. A proceeding under this section is governed by AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.580

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 103 SLA 2006)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, “AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.580

'” was substituted for “AS 13.26.090 —

13.26.320

”' to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 103, SLA 2006 makes the 2006 amendment of this section retroactive to January 1, 2005.

Sec. 13.52.150.
Do not resuscitate orders and identification of other jurisdictions.

A do not resuscitate order or a do not resuscitate identification executed, issued, or authorized in another state or a territory or possession of the United States is valid for the purposes of this chapter if it complies with the laws of this state. A health care provider or health care institution may presume, in the absence of actual notice to the contrary, that the do not resuscitate order or the do not resuscitate identification complies with the laws of this state, regardless of where or when it was executed, issued, or authorized, and that the patient is a qualified patient.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 11 ch 103 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 103, SLA 2006 makes the 2006 amendment of this section retroactive to January 1, 2005.

Sec. 13.52.160.
Determination of qualifying condition.

Whether a patient has a qualifying condition under this chapter shall be determined by the primary physician of the patient and by at least one other physician, when another physician is available. A physician making the determination shall document the grounds for the determination in the patient’s medical record. Permanent unconsciousness shall be determined in consultation with a neurologist.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.170.
Making, amending, revoking, and refusing to make anatomical gifts by individual. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.173.
Who may make anatomical gift before donor’s death.

Subject to AS

13.52.193

, an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or part may be made during the life of the donor for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education in the manner provided in AS

13.52.177

by

the donor, if the donor is an adult or if the donor is a minor and is

emancipated; or

authorized under state law to apply for a driver’s license because the donor is at least 16 years of age;

an agent of the donor, unless a durable power of attorney for health care or another record prohibits the agent from making an anatomical gift;

a parent of the donor, if the donor is an unemancipated minor;

the donor’s guardian; or

a surrogate.

History.

(§ 18 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.177.
Manner of making anatomical gift before donor’s death.

A donor may make an anatomical gift

by authorizing a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an anatomical gift to be imprinted on the donor’s driver’s license or identification card;

in a will;

during a terminal condition of the donor, by any form of communication addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness; or

as provided in (b) of this section.

A donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.173

may make a gift by a donor card or another record signed by the donor or another person making the gift or by authorizing that a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an anatomical gift be included on a donor registry. If the donor or another person is physically unable to sign a record, the record may be signed by another individual at the direction of the donor or the other person and must

be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or the other person; and

state that the record has been signed and witnessed as provided in (1) of this subsection.

Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a driver’s license or an identification card on which an anatomical gift is indicated does not invalidate the gift.

An anatomical gift made by will takes effect upon the donor’s death whether or not the will is probated. Invalidation of the will after the donor’s death does not invalidate the gift.

History.

(§ 18 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.180.
Making, revoking, and objecting to anatomical gifts by others. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.183.
Amending or revoking anatomical gift before donor’s death.

Except in the case of mental illness under AS

13.52.020(c)

, and subject to AS

13.52.193

, a donor or another person authorized to make an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.173

may amend or revoke an anatomical gift by

a record signed by

the donor;

the other person; or

subject to (b) of this section, another individual acting at the direction of the donor or the other person if the donor or other person is physically unable to sign; or

a later-executed document of gift that amends or revokes a previous anatomical gift or portion of an anatomical gift, either expressly or by inconsistency.

A record signed under (a)(1)(C) of this section must

be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or the other person; and

state that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in (1) of this subsection.

Subject to AS

13.52.193

, a donor or another person authorized to make an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.173

may revoke an anatomical gift by the destruction or cancellation of the document of gift, or the portion of the document of gift used to make the gift, with the intent to revoke the gift.

A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical gift that was not made in a will by any form of communication during a terminal condition addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

A donor who makes an anatomical gift in a will may amend or revoke the gift in the manner provided for amendment or revocation of wills or as provided in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 19 ch 100 SLA 2008)